New York, session 2025-2026, A9057.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 9 of part JJ of chapter 57 of the laws of 2025, 2 amending the public health law relating to reporting pregnancy losses 3 and clarifying which agencies are responsible for such reports, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 § 9. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 6 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2025; provided, 7 however that [the amendments to subdivision 2 of section 4160 of the 8 public health law made by] section [two] three of this act shall [expire 9 and be deemed repealed] take effect March 30, 2027[, when upon such date 10 the provisions of section three of this act shall take effect]. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13313-01-5